District of Columbia statutes.
2-358.01

Supply management rules.

The CPO shall issue rules governing:

(1)

The management of goods during their entire life cycle;

(2)

The sale, lease, disposal, or transfer of surplus goods by public auction, competitive sealed bidding, competitive electronic sales, or other appropriate method designated by rule; provided, that no employee of the disposing agency shall be entitled to purchase any surplus goods.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 801, 58 DCR 1185